District of Columbia statutes.
Omitted

4-103

Board of Public Welfare — Composition; appointment; term of office; vacancies; residency requirement; removal; compensation.

Omitted.

Omission of Text

The provisions of former § 4-103 have been omitted as obsolete, the Board referred to herein having been abolished. See notes following § 4-102.